Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-106
Nebraska State Historical Society; public documents, records, relics; notice to be given.

Every officer or board having control or management of any state department, institution or building shall notify the secretary of the Nebraska State Historical Society whenever any of the historical material mentioned in sections 82-104 and 82-105 shall be in his or their care.

Laws 1905, c. 157, § 3, p. 605;

R.S.1913, § 7171;

C.S.1922, § 6822;

C.S.1929, § 82-106;

R.S.1943, § 82-106.